Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 4. Membership in Retirement System.

§ 51.1-125.
Persons composing membership; persons holding more than one position.

All persons who become employees after March 1, 1952, shall be members of the retirement system, except for the following persons:

Any person who elects not to participate as provided in this chapter, or who elected not to participate in the abolished system.

Any person who becomes an employee and who elects to remain a member of a local pension system where such election is allowed by state law.

Any member of a local system who through promotion achieves a position bringing him within the definition of a teacher if he elects within sixty days, with the concurrence of his employer, to remain a member of the local system.

No person shall hold more than one membership in the retirement system at any one time with respect to any of the benefits provided under this title. Any person employed in more than one position resulting in membership shall elect one position on which his membership shall be based by written notification thereof to the Board.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.27; 1954, c. 241; 1960, c. 400; 1973, c. 523; 1978, c. 841; 1982, c. 467; 1984, c. 430; 1985, c. 490; 1987, c. 575; 1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-126.
Employees of institutions of higher education.

For purposes of this section, “optional retirement plan” means a retirement plan covering the employee for retirement purposes other than the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan established under this chapter or the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

.

The Board shall maintain an optional retirement plan covering employees engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties with an institution of higher education and any institution of higher education is authorized to make contributions to such plan for the benefit of its employees participating in such plan. Except (i) as provided in subsection B for institutions of higher education that have established their own optional retirement plan and (ii) for employees described in subdivision A 2, every employee hired by an institution of higher education on or after July 1, 2003, engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties shall make an irrevocable election to participate in either (a) the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan established by this chapter until January 1, 2014, and thereafter, the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

or (b) an optional retirement plan maintained by the Board. Such election shall be exercised no later than 60 days from the time of the employee’s entry upon the performance of his duties. If an election is not made within such 60 days, such employee shall be deemed to have elected to participate in the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan or the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, as applicable.
A. 1. The Board shall maintain an optional retirement plan covering employees engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties with an institution of higher education and any institution of higher education is authorized to make contributions to such plan for the benefit of its employees participating in such plan. Except (i) as provided in subsection B for institutions of higher education that have established their own optional retirement plan and (ii) for employees described in subdivision A 2, every employee hired by an institution of higher education on or after July 1, 2003, engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties shall make an irrevocable election to participate in either (a) the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan established by this chapter until January 1, 2014, and thereafter, the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

or (b) an optional retirement plan maintained by the Board. Such election shall be exercised no later than 60 days from the time of the employee’s entry upon the performance of his duties. If an election is not made within such 60 days, such employee shall be deemed to have elected to participate in the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan or the hybrid retirement program described in § 51.1-169, as applicable.

Any employee (i) hired on or after July 1, 2003, by an institution of higher education engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties; and (ii) who at the time of hiring is in continuous service in the performance of such teaching, administrative, or research duties shall participate in the optional retirement plan maintained by the Board if the most recent retirement plan covering the employee prior to such hiring was an optional retirement plan. If the most recent retirement plan covering the employee prior to such hiring was the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan or the hybrid retirement program described in § 51.1-169, such person shall participate in such defined benefit retirement plan or such hybrid retirement program, as applicable, from the time of his entry upon the performance of his duties.

Any institution of higher education, upon receipt of approval by the Board in writing, may establish and maintain its own optional retirement plan covering its employees who are engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties. Upon such approval, such institution is authorized to make contributions to its own optional retirement plan for the benefit of its employees who elect to participate or who are required to participate in such plan as provided in this subsection.
B. 1. Any institution of higher education, upon receipt of approval by the Board in writing, may establish and maintain its own optional retirement plan covering its employees who are engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties. Upon such approval, such institution is authorized to make contributions to its own optional retirement plan for the benefit of its employees who elect to participate or who are required to participate in such plan as provided in this subsection.

Every employee, with the exception of employees described in subdivision B 3, (i) hired on or after July 1, 2003, by an institution of higher education that has established and is maintaining its own optional retirement plan pursuant to this subsection and (ii) engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties shall make an irrevocable election to participate in either: (a) the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan established by this chapter until January 1, 2014, and thereafter, the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, as applicable; or (b) such optional retirement plan of the institution of higher education. Such employee shall not be provided any election to participate in an optional retirement plan maintained by the Board.The election shall be exercised no later than 60 days from the time of the employee’s entry upon the performance of his duties. If an election is not made within such 60 days, such employee shall be deemed to have elected to participate in the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan established by this chapter or the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, as applicable.

Any employee (i) hired on or after July 1, 2003, by an institution of higher education engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties; and (ii) who at the time of hiring is in continuous service in the performance of such teaching, administrative, or research duties shall participate in the optional retirement plan established by the institution of higher education pursuant to this subsection if the most recent retirement plan covering the employee prior to such hiring was an optional retirement plan. If the most recent retirement plan covering the employee prior to such hiring was the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan or the hybrid retirement program described in § 51.1-169, such person shall participate in such defined benefit retirement plan or such hybrid retirement program, as applicable, from the time of his entry upon the performance of his duties.

Any employee engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties at an institution of higher education who was covered under an optional retirement plan for retirement purposes, other than the optional retirement plan established by such institution pursuant to subdivision B 1, shall, at the time such institution establishes its own optional retirement plan pursuant to subdivision B 1, automatically and immediately begin to participate in the optional retirement plan established pursuant to subdivision B 1, notwithstanding such employee’s prior election to participate in a different optional retirement plan.

Any administrative fee imposed pursuant to subdivision A 13 of §

51.1-124.22

upon any institution of higher education for administering and overseeing the institution’s retirement plan established pursuant to subsection A shall be charged for each employee participating in such plan and shall be for costs incurred by the Retirement System that are directly related to the administration and oversight of such plan.
D. 1. Any administrative fee imposed pursuant to subdivision A 13 of §

51.1-124.22

upon any institution of higher education for administering and overseeing the institution’s retirement plan established pursuant to subsection A shall be charged for each employee participating in such plan and shall be for costs incurred by the Retirement System that are directly related to the administration and oversight of such plan.

Each institution of higher education may charge and collect a reimbursement fee from each employee participating in the institution’s retirement plan established pursuant to subsection A. The total amount charged and collected for such fee from all such employees for any year shall not exceed the total of the costs described in subdivision D 1 and charged to the institution for such year.

No employee of an institution of higher education who is an active member in any plan maintained by the Board or established by an institution of higher education, pursuant to this section, shall also be an active member of the retirement system or beneficiary other than a contingent annuitant.
E. 1. No employee of an institution of higher education who is an active member in any plan maintained by the Board or established by an institution of higher education, pursuant to this section, shall also be an active member of the retirement system or beneficiary other than a contingent annuitant.

If a member of the optional retirement plan maintained under this section is at any time in service as an employee in a position covered for retirement purposes under the provisions of Chapters 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.), his benefit payments under the optional retirement plan maintained under this section shall be suspended while so employed; provided, however, reemployment shall have no effect on the payment under the optional plan maintained under this section if the benefits are being paid in an annuity form under an annuity contract purchased with the member’s account balance.

The contribution by the Commonwealth on behalf of an employee participating in an optional retirement plan maintained by the Board or on behalf of an employee participating in an optional retirement plan established by his institution of higher education under this section to such employee’s retirement plan shall be (i) at least 8.5 percent but not in excess of 8.9 percent of creditable compensation for any person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, and (ii) 10.4 percent of creditable compensation for all other employees. Any institution of higher education that elects a contribution in excess of 8.5 percent of creditable compensation for any employee described in clause (i) shall provide for the same percentage of creditable compensation as contributions for each of its employees described in clause (i) who participates in such optional retirement plan. The portion of the contribution in excess of 8.5 percent of creditable compensation pursuant to clause (i) shall not be funded from the general fund of the state treasury, but shall be paid by the institution of higher education from other funds. In addition, any person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, shall, pursuant to procedures established by the Board, pay member contributions on a salary reduction basis in accordance with § 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, in an amount equal to five percent of his creditable compensation, to the optional retirement plan maintained by the Board on his behalf or the optional retirement plan established by his institution of higher education on his behalf, as applicable. Each employee making such member contribution shall be deemed to consent and agree to any salary reduction for purposes of the member contribution. Such member contributions shall be in addition to all contributions pursuant to clause (i). An institution of higher education may make an additional contribution for participants who, before January 1, 1991, exercised the election to participate in the plan provided by the institution employing them. Such additional contributions shall be made using funds other than general funds, tuition or fees, up to an additional 2.17 percent of creditable compensation.
F. 1. The contribution by the Commonwealth on behalf of an employee participating in an optional retirement plan maintained by the Board or on behalf of an employee participating in an optional retirement plan established by his institution of higher education under this section to such employee’s retirement plan shall be (i) at least 8.5 percent but not in excess of 8.9 percent of creditable compensation for any person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, and (ii) 10.4 percent of creditable compensation for all other employees. Any institution of higher education that elects a contribution in excess of 8.5 percent of creditable compensation for any employee described in clause (i) shall provide for the same percentage of creditable compensation as contributions for each of its employees described in clause (i) who participates in such optional retirement plan. The portion of the contribution in excess of 8.5 percent of creditable compensation pursuant to clause (i) shall not be funded from the general fund of the state treasury, but shall be paid by the institution of higher education from other funds. In addition, any person who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2010, shall, pursuant to procedures established by the Board, pay member contributions on a salary reduction basis in accordance with § 414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, in an amount equal to five percent of his creditable compensation, to the optional retirement plan maintained by the Board on his behalf or the optional retirement plan established by his institution of higher education on his behalf, as applicable. Each employee making such member contribution shall be deemed to consent and agree to any salary reduction for purposes of the member contribution. Such member contributions shall be in addition to all contributions pursuant to clause (i). An institution of higher education may make an additional contribution for participants who, before January 1, 1991, exercised the election to participate in the plan provided by the institution employing them. Such additional contributions shall be made using funds other than general funds, tuition or fees, up to an additional 2.17 percent of creditable compensation.

The governing board of any institution of higher education that establishes its own optional retirement plan pursuant to this section may establish a policy regarding the number of years of service, or portion thereof, that an employee must perform before such employee shall be entitled to receive all contributions made on his behalf by the institution to the optional retirement plan. If an employee has less than the number of years of service, or portion thereof, established by the governing board at the time he ceases employment, other than by death or involuntary separation due to causes other than job performance or misconduct, as determined by the institution of higher education in its sole discretion, he shall not receive or be entitled to that portion of the contributions that was paid by the institution on his behalf for which he does not have the required service. The institution of higher education may establish a forfeiture account for such employer contributions forgone by the employee and may specify the uses of funds in the forfeiture account. The provisions of this subdivision shall apply only to any person who (i) becomes a participant in the institution of higher education’s optional retirement plan on or after July 1, 2014, and (ii) is not an employee described under subdivision B 3. Any future change to a policy established by the governing board of an institution of higher education pursuant to this subdivision regarding the number of years of service required for an employee to receive all contributions made by the institution to the optional retirement plan shall apply only to new employees hired on or after the date of the change.

The contribution rates established pursuant to subdivision 1 shall be examined by the Board at least once every six years. The examination shall consider the salary peer group mean contribution as determined by the State Council of Higher Education and the Virginia Retirement System actuary, and, if deemed advisable, recommend a revision to the rate of contribution by the Commonwealth.

With respect to any employee who elects pursuant to subsection A or B to participate in the Virginia Retirement System defined benefit retirement plan established by this chapter or the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, the institution of higher education shall collect and pay all employee and employer contributions to the Virginia Retirement System for retirement and group life insurance in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.) for such employees.

The Virginia Retirement System shall develop policies and procedures for the administration of the optional retirement plan it maintains. To assist the Virginia Retirement System in developing such policies and procedures, the Board may appoint an advisory committee of higher education employees to supply guidance in the process.

As a condition of the Board granting approval to an institution of higher education to establish its own optional retirement plan, the institution of higher education shall develop policies and procedures for the administration of such plan and shall submit such policies and procedures to the Board as part of the Board-approval process required under this section. In addition, an institution of higher education that is granted approval by the Board to establish its own optional retirement plan covering employees engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties shall not adopt or implement policies and procedures that are substantially different from the policies and procedures approved by the Board in the initial approval process unless the Board, in writing, approves such substantially different policies and procedures.

The Board shall establish guidelines for the employee elections referred to in subdivision B 2 and shall review and, if deemed advisable, recommend revisions to the contribution rates as described in subsection F. Except for the duties described in subsection I, the Board shall have no duties and responsibilities with respect to such plans established pursuant to subsection B.

History.

1952, c. 157, § 51-111.28; 1978, c. 841; 1982, c. 467; 1987, c. 215; 1990, c. 832; 1991, cc. 217, 645; 1996, cc. 933, 995; 2000, cc. 722, 723; 2001, c. 691; 2003, cc. 369, 626; 2005, c. 793; 2010, cc. 737, 738; 2012, cc. 701, 823; 2014, cc. 745, 764.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2003, c. 369, cl. 2, provides: “That, except as provided in this enactment, prior to December 31, 2003, no institution of higher education may establish and maintain an optional retirement plan covering its employees who are engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties. On or before November 1, 2003, and prior to granting approval to any institution of higher education to establish and maintain such optional retirement plan, the Board of Trustees of the Virginia Retirement System shall prepare and release a plan to the chairmen of the Senate Finance Committee and House Appropriations Committee establishing criteria and guidelines that shall be applied by the Board in determining whether to grant approval to an institution of higher education to establish and maintain such optional retirement plan. No institution of higher education shall establish and maintain such optional retirement plan unless it has been granted approval by the Board, in writing, in accordance with such criteria and guidelines. The provisions of this enactment shall not be applicable to any institution of higher education that (i) prior to July 1, 2003, established an optional retirement plan for its employees who are engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties, and (ii) is maintaining such plan as of June 30, 2003.”

Acts 2003, c. 302, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of subsection C of §

51.1-126

requiring certain employees engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties at an institution of higher education to participate in an optional retirement plan established by such institution shall apply to both (i) any such employee who elected prior to July 1, 2003, to participate in an optional retirement plan pursuant to §

51.1-126

and who is covered by an optional retirement plan at the time such institution establishes its own optional retirement plan and (ii) any such employee who on or after July 1, 2003, elected to participate in an optional retirement plan maintained by the Board.”

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

Acts 2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, as amended by Acts 2019, c. 854,
Item 474 O provides: “1. a. In order to address the potential for stranded liability in the Virginia Retirement System, notwithstanding any other contrary provisions of the Appropriation Act or of §

51.1-145

, institutions of higher education that have established their own optional retirement plan under §

51.1-126

(B) shall pay, effective July 1, 2019, contributions to the employer’s retirement allowance account in an amount equal to that portion of the state employer contribution rate designated to pay down the total unfunded accrued liability, for any positions existing as of December 31, 2011 that are subsequently converted from non-Optional Retirement Plan for Higher Education (ORPHE) eligible positions to ORPHE-eligible positions on or after January 1, 2012 and that are filled by an employee who elects to participate in the ORPHE. In meeting this obligation, each institution shall provide to the Virginia Retirement System by April 1 of each year a list of all positions converted from non-ORPHE eligible positions to ORPHE-eligible positions since January 1, 2012, and whether current employees in such positions have elected ORPHE participation.

“b. Such contributions shall not be required for any new position established by the institution after January 1, 2012, that may be eligible for participation in the Optional Retirement Plan for Higher Education.

“2. Furthermore, the Department of Accounts, the Virginia Retirement System, and the universities of higher education shall work to develop a methodology to identify and report separately personnel services expenditures for university personnel in positions that use to be classified positions but have been transitioned to university staff positions.

“3. The Virginia Retirement System and the universities of higher education shall submit a report to the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees by November 15, 2018 on the approximate unfunded liability that maybe attributable to these positions and the level of additional contributions the system will realize from the surcharge.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 722 deleted “the position of” following “State Council of Higher Education and” in subdivision C 2, and in subsection D, deleted “as approved by the Secretaries of Administration and Education” following “procedures” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2000 amendment by c. 723, in the last sentence of subsection A, substituted “July 1, 2000” for “the effective date of any retirement plan established pursuant to §

51.1-126.3

” and “coverage” for “election options”; and in subdivision C 1, deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Any employee of the University of Virginia Medical Center who participated in a retirement plan established pursuant to this section prior to the effective date of such employee’s transfer to a retirement plan established under §

51.1-126.3

shall continue to receive the contribution by the Commonwealth, and any supplementation thereof by the University, at the contribution and supplementation rates which were in effect on the effective date of such transfer.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 691 substituted “sixty days” for “ninety days” in the third sentence of subsection A.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 369 rewrote this section.

The 2003 amendment by c. 626 substituted “60” for “sixty” in subsection A; inserted present subsection D, and redesignated the former subsection D as subsection E (now G).

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 793 redesignated former subsection E as subdivision E 1 and inserted subdivision E 2; and deleted “of this title” preceding “for such employees” in subsection G.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 737 and 738 are identical, and rewrote subdivision F 1, which formerly read: “The contribution by the Commonwealth on behalf of an employee participating in an optional retirement plan maintained by the Board or on behalf of an employee participating in an optional retirement plan established by his institution of higher education under this section to such employee’s retirement plan shall be 10.4 percent of creditable compensation. An institution of higher education may make an additional contribution for participants who, before January 1, 1991, exercised the election to participate in the plan provided by the institution employing them. Such additional contributions shall be made using funds other than general funds, tuition or fees, up to an additional 2.17 percent of creditable compensation.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are nearly identical, and added “or the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

” at the end of the first paragraph; in subdivision A 1, inserted “until January 1, 2014, and thereafter, the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

” in clause (a) of the first sentence, and added “or the hybrid retirement program described in § 51.1-169, as applicable” at the end of the second sentence; in subdivision A 2, inserted “or the hybrid retirement program described in § 51.1-169” and “or such hybrid retirement program, as applicable” in clause (a) of the first sentence; in subdivision B 2, inserted “until January 1, 2014, and thereafter, the hybrid retirement program described in § 51.1-169, as applicable” at the end of clause (a) of the first sentence of the first paragraph, and added “or the hybrid retirement program described in § 51.1-169, as applicable” at the end of the second sentence of the second paragraph; in subdivision B 3, inserted “or the hybrid retirement program described in § 51.1-169” and “or such hybrid retirement program, as applicable”; and in subsection G, inserted “or the hybrid retirement program described in § 51.1-169.” Additional stylistic changes were made by c. 701.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 745 and 764 are identical, and added subdivision F 2 and made related changes; and inserted “established pursuant to subdivision 1” in subdivision F 3.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Administrative fees may not be charged to institutions of higher education for which optional retirement is provided. —

The Virginia Retirement System has no authority to recover administrative costs from institutions of higher education for which it provides an optional retirement plan for employees of such institutions. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. W. Forrest Matthews, Jr., Director, Virginia Retirement System, 01-123 (4/29/02).

§ 51.1-126.1.
Certain employees of teaching hospitals.

Any teaching hospital affiliated with an institution of higher education, other than the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority or the University of Virginia Medical Center, may establish a retirement plan covering in whole or in part its employees who are health care providers, as determined by the Department of Human Resource Management pursuant to §

2.2-2905

, and is authorized to make contributions for the benefit of its employees who elect to participate in such plan or arrangement rather than in the retirement system established by this chapter. Any such alternative retirement plan shall not become effective until July 1, 1991, or any time thereafter, as determined by such teaching hospital. Any health care provider employed by such teaching hospital on or after July 1, 1991, may make an irrevocable election to participate in either the retirement plan established by this chapter or the plan provided by the teaching hospital, in accordance with guidelines established by the Virginia Retirement System. The election herein provided shall, as to any health care provider employed after the alternative retirement plan implementation date, be exercised not later than thirty-one days from the time of entry upon the performance of his duties.

No health care provider employed by a teaching hospital who is an active member of a plan established under this section shall also be an active member of the retirement system or a beneficiary other than a contingent annuitant.

The contribution by the Commonwealth to any other retirement plan established on behalf of health care providers as provided in subsection A shall be the contribution by the Commonwealth which would be required if the health care provider were a member of the retirement system or eight percent of creditable compensation, whichever is less.

If the institution of higher education with which the teaching hospital is affiliated has adopted a retirement plan under §

51.1-126

for its employees who are engaged in the performance of teaching, administrative, or research duties, the plan established under this section shall offer the same investment opportunities as are available to the participants of the plan established under §

51.1-126

.

The Virginia Retirement System shall develop policies and procedures for the administration of the retirement plan established under this section.

History.

1991, c. 645; 1993, c. 895; 1996, cc. 905, 933, 995, 1046; 2000, cc. 66, 657, 720.

Cross references.

As to health insurance credits for certain retirees, see §

51.1-1400

et seq.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by cc. 66 and 657 are identical, and substituted “Human Resource Management” for “Personnel and Training” in the first sentence of subsection A.

The 2000 amendment by c. 720 substituted “Virginia Commonwealth University Health System” for “Medical College of Virginia Hospitals” in the first sentence of subsection A.

§ 51.1-126.2.
Repealed by Acts 1998, c. 449.